District of Columbia statutes.
28-5204

Terms for unit pricing.

The declaration of the unit price of a particular commodity in all package sizes offered for sale in a retail establishment shall be uniformly and consistently expressed in terms of:

(1)

Price per kilogram or 100 grams, or price per pound or ounce, if the net quantity of contents of the commodity is in terms of weight;

(2)

Price per liter or 100 milliliters, or price per dry quart or dry pint, if the net quantity of contents of the commodity is in terms of dry measure or volume;

(3)

Price per liter or 100 milliliters, or price per gallon, quart, pint, or fluid ounce, if the net quantity of contents of the commodity is in terms of liquid volume;

(4)

Price per individual unit or multiple units if the net quantity of contents of the commodity is in terms of count; or

(5)

Price per square meter, square decimeter, or square centimeter, or price per square yard, square foot, or square inch, if the net quantity of contents of the commodity is in terms of area.

History

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132